Utah statutes.
20A-3-503.   Influencing employee's vote.
(1)  It is unlawful for any corporation, or any officer or agent of any
corporation, to influence, or attempt to influence, induce, or compel by
force, violence, or restraint, or by inflicting or threatening to inflict any
injury, damage, harm, or loss, or by discharging from employment or promoting
in employment, or by intimidation, or in any manner whatever, any employee to
vote or refrain from voting at any election provided by law, or to vote or
refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at that election.
(2) (a)  Any corporation or any officer or agent of that corporation who
violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
(b)  Any corporation violating any of the provisions of this section shall
forfeit its charter and right to do business in this state in addition to any
other penalties imposed by law.
